New York, session 2025-2026, S6349.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law or any other provision of law to the contrary, Franklynn 3 Smith, who has been continuously employed by the village of Perry, in 4 the county of Wyoming, as a part-time police officer, shall be eligible 5 to take the competitive civil service examination for the position of 6 police officer and shall, contingent upon his score on such examination, 7 be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for appointment as a full- 8 time police officer with the village of Perry. 9 § 2. Franklynn Smith shall otherwise be subject to the merit and 10 fitness provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time 11 police officers. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10648-01-5